Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-1068
School districts; entity constructing electric generating facility; retroactive payments authorized.

For each school year commencing with the 1977-78 school year which has begun or has been completed prior to February 19, 1981, a public power district, public power and irrigation district, municipality, electric cooperative, electric membership corporation, or other entity subject to sections 79-1066 to 79-1069 may pay to any impacted school district, upon written request with certified supporting information from such school district within one hundred eighty days after February 19, 1981, an amount which shall not exceed the amount calculated in accordance with the formula set forth in section 79-1067 as applied to the applicable school year.

Laws 1981, LB 15, § 3;

Laws 1985, LB 6, § 3;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-1373;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 714.